Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [471.9999] LOCAL GOVERNMENTS; TRAFFIC LAW ENFORCEMENT. new text end new text begin A local unit of government, including a prosecutorial office or law enforcement agency, may not adopt an ordinance or policy that prohibits or restricts the enforcement or prosecution of violations of traffic laws or any specific traffic law. Any ordinance or policy in violation of this section is void. new text end